Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2814
Device, defined.

Device means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or related article, including any component, part, or accessory, which is prescribed by a practitioner and dispensed by a pharmacist or other person authorized by law to do so.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 910.